Hawaii statutes.
§392-44 Payment of disability benefits.
Benefits provided under this chapter shall be paid periodically and promptly
and, except as to a contested period of disability, without any decision by the
director. The first payment of benefits shall be paid within ten days,
exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays and holidays, after the filing of required
proof of claim. Thereafter, benefits shall be due and payable every two
weeks. The director may determine that benefits may be paid monthly or
semi-monthly if wages were so paid, and may authorize deviation from the
foregoing requirements to facilitate prompt payment of benefits. If an
employer or insurer fails to make the first payment of benefits within ten
days, exclusive of Saturdays, Sundays and holidays, after the filing of
required proof of claim, the director shall, unless good cause can be shown,
require the employer or insurer to pay such benefits plus an additional ten per
cent of the benefits due and payable to the employee. [L 1969, c 148, pt of §1;
am L 1971, c 109, §1(g)]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next